Texas, session 892, SB56.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 162, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 162.021 to read as follows: Sec. 162.021.  AUTOLOGOUS OR DIRECT BLOOD DONATION.  (a) A blood bank shall comply with a physician's order prescribing for an individual an autologous or direct blood donation. (b)  A blood bank may charge a fee in an amount reasonable and necessary to cover the administrative cost to the blood bank of facilitating an autologous or direct blood donation ordered by a physician under Subsection (a). SECTION 2.  Subchapter A, Chapter 241, Health and Safety Code, is amended by adding Section 241.013 to read as follows: Sec. 241.013.  AUTOLOGOUS AND DIRECT BLOOD DONATIONS.  A hospital licensed under this chapter that facilitates blood donations shall allow an individual on whom a medical procedure is to be performed to provide an autologous or direct blood donation a physician orders for the procedure. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.